Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5129
Business entity obligations.

An insurer may invest in obligations of a business entity created or existing under the laws of the United States or Canada or any state or province thereof. Any investment authorized under this section shall have a minimum quality rating as described in subdivision (2) of section 44-5112.

Laws 1991, LB 237, § 29;

Laws 1997, LB 273, § 14.